Arkansas, session 2025, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title. This act shall be known and may be
cited as the "Pharmacy Nondiscrimination Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The state's any willing provider laws under §§ 23-99-204 —
23-99-210 ensure fair access to healthcare providers, fostering competition
and consumer choice;
(2) Pharmacy benefits managers play a key role in the delivery
*ANS086*
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
and management of pharmacy benefits; and
(3) Practices that exclude qualified pharmacies or pharmacists
without reasonable justification could restrict competition and limit patient
access.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act shall
clarify and update the principles of the state's any willing provider laws
applicable to pharmacy benefits managers to ensure that any willing pharmacy
or pharmacist that meets relevant and reasonable participation criteria may
join a pharmacy benefits manager network consistent with state and federal
law, as most healthcare insurers contract with pharmacy benefits managers to
administer pharmacy benefits.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-203(d), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" under the Patient Protection Act of 1995, is amended to
read as follows:
(d) "Healthcare provider" means those individuals or entities licensed
by the State of Arkansas to provide healthcare services, limited to the
following:
(1) Advanced practice nurses;
(2) Athletic trainers;
(3) Audiologists;
(4) Certified behavioral health providers;
(5) Certified orthotists;
(6) Chiropractors;
(7) Community mental health centers or clinics;
(8) Dentists;
(9) Home health care;
(10) Hospice care;
(11) Hospital-based services;
(12) Hospitals;
(13) Licensed ambulatory surgery centers;
(14) Licensed certified social workers;
(15) Licensed dieticians;
(16) Licensed intellectual and developmental disabilities
service providers;
(17) Licensed professional counselors;
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
(18) Licensed psychological examiners;
(19) Long-term care facilities;
(20) Occupational therapists;
(21) Optometrists;
(22) Pharmacists and pharmacies;
(23) Physical therapists;
(24) Physicians and surgeons (M.D. and D.O.);
(25) Podiatrists;
(26) Prosthetists;
(27) Psychologists;
(28) Respiratory therapists;
(29) Rural health clinics; and
(30) Speech pathologists.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-99-802(4), concerning the definition of
"healthcare provider" as used under the any willing provider laws, is amended
to read as follows:
(4) "Healthcare provider" or “provider” means those individuals
or entities licensed by the State of Arkansas to provide healthcare services,
limited to the following:
(A) Advanced practice nurses;
(B) Athletic trainers;
(C) Audiologists;
(D) Certified behavioral health providers;
(E) Certified orthotists;
(F) Chiropractors;
(G) Community mental health centers or clinics;
(H) Dentists;
(I) Home health care;
(J) Hospice care;
(K) Hospital-based services;
(L) Hospitals;
(M) Licensed ambulatory surgery centers;
(N) Licensed certified social workers;
(O) Licensed dieticians;
(P) Licensed durable medical equipment providers;
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
(Q) Licensed intellectual and developmental disabilities
service providers;
(R) Licensed professional counselors;
(S) Licensed psychological examiners;
(T) Long-term care facilities;
(U) Occupational therapists;
(V) Optometrists;
(W) Pharmacists and pharmacies;
(X) Physical therapists;
(Y) Physicians and surgeons (M.D. and D.O.);
(Z) Podiatrists;
(AA) Prosthetists;
(BB) Psychologists;
(CC) Respiratory therapists;
(DD) Rural health clinics;
(EE) Speech pathologists; and
(FF) Other healthcare practitioners as determined by the
State Insurance Department in rules promulgated under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-99-211. Pharmacy benefits manager network participation —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Pharmacist" means an individual licensed as a pharmacist by
the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;
(2) "Pharmacy" means the place licensed by the board in which
drugs, chemicals, medicines, prescriptions, and poisons are compounded,
dispensed, or sold at retail;
(3) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means a person, business, or
entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary of a
pharmacy benefits manager, that:
(A) Provides claims processing services or other
prescription drug or devices services, or both, for health benefit plans; and
(B) Is licensed under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
Manager Licensure Act, § 23-92-502;
(4)(A) "Pharmacy benefits manager network" means any network of
pharmacists or pharmacies that are offered by an agreement or insurance
contract to provide pharmacist services for health benefit plans.
(B) "Pharmacy benefits manager network" includes any
network delegated by the healthcare payor to the pharmacy benefits manager;
and
(5) "Relevant and reasonable terms of participation" means terms
and conditions that:
(A) Are consistent with applicable state and federal law;
(B) Are consistent with industry standards; and
(C) Do not arbitrarily or discriminatorily exclude a
qualified pharmacy or pharmacist.
(b)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not deny a pharmacy or
pharmacist the opportunity to participate in the pharmacy benefits manager's
network if the pharmacy or pharmacist:
(A) Is licensed under the laws of this state; and
(B) Agrees to accept and comply with the relevant and
reasonable terms of participation as determined under this section.
(2) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not exclude a pharmacy or
pharmacist from continued participation in the pharmacy benefits manager's
pharmacy benefits manager network if the pharmacy or pharmacist continues to:
(A) Be licensed under the laws of this state; and
(B) Accept and comply with the relevant and reasonable
terms of participation as determined under this section.
(3) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not:
(A) Condition participation of a pharmacy or pharmacist in
one (1) pharmacy benefits manager network based on participation in any other
pharmacy benefits manager network or penalize a pharmacy or pharmacist for
exercising his, her, or its prerogative not to participate in a specific
pharmacy benefits manager network; or
(B) Limit a pharmacy benefits manager network to include
solely:
(i) An affiliated pharmacy; or
(ii) An internet pharmacy or a pharmacy that does
not have a physical presence in this state for consumer access.
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
(c)(1) If a pharmacy or pharmacist alleges that a pharmacy benefits
manager has denied or excluded the pharmacy or pharmacist from participation
in the pharmacy benefits manager's pharmacy benefits manager network without
justification, the pharmacy or pharmacist may submit a written complaint to
the Insurance Commissioner.
(2) If a dispute arises as to whether there are "relevant and
reasonable terms of participation" as that term is defined in this section,
the commissioner shall decide the issue by determining whether the terms or
conditions:
(A) Are consistent with applicable state and federal law;
(B) Are consistent with industry standards; and
(C) Do not arbitrarily or discriminatorily exclude a
qualified pharmacy or pharmacist.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the complaint under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the commissioner, after a hearing
conducted under § 23-61-301 and consideration of evidence from all parties,
shall issue a determination.
(4) The determination of the commissioner under subdivision
(c)(3) of this section is binding on all parties, subject to judicial review
under § 23-61-307.
(d) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not:
(1) Impose terms or conditions that do not meet the definition
of "relevant and reasonable terms of participation" under this section;
(2) Utilize reimbursement methodologies or contractual clauses
intended to indirectly exclude a willing pharmacy or pharmacist from
participation; or
(3) Engage in a practice that discriminates against a pharmacy
or pharmacist based on the pharmacy's or pharmacist's geographic location,
size, or ownership structure, unless the geographic location, size, or
ownership structure is directly relevant to patient care or network adequacy.
(e) This section does not:
(1) Regulate the design or administration of employee benefit
plans; or
(2) Impose requirements directly on employee benefit plans.
(f) This section applies to the trade practices of pharmacy benefits
managers operating in this state, including a pharmacy benefits manager's
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
pharmacy benefits manager network participation requirements and marketing or
sale of pharmacy benefits manager network products and services, as permitted
under state law.
(g) This section is enforceable with respect to a pharmacy benefits
manager's compliance with state rules regarding healthcare provider equity
and market practices.
(h)(1) The commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to implement,
administer, and enforce this section.
(2) Rules that the commissioner may adopt under this section
include without limitation rules relating to:
(A) Providing a process for resolving disputes between
pharmacies, pharmacists, and pharmacy benefits managers;
(B) Ensuring compliance with state and federal laws; and
(C) Monitoring compliance with this section by licensed
pharmacy benefits managers.
(i)(1) After notice and opportunity for a hearing, if a pharmacy
benefits manager is found to have violated this section, the commissioner
may:
(A) Impose a fine of up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) per violation;
(B) Prohibit the pharmacy benefits manager from marketing,
selling, or utilizing one (1) or more offending products, pharmacy benefits
manager networks, or services within this state until the pharmacy benefits
manager complies with this section; and
(C) Revoke or suspend the license of a pharmacy benefits
manager to operate in this state.
(2) A penalty under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall be
enforced by the commissioner according to rules promulgated under this
section.
(j) A prohibition under this section is applicable to a person or
entity that:
(1) Performs the prohibited activity;
(2) Causes another person or entity to perform the prohibited
activity;
(3) Solicits, advises, encourages, or coerces another person or
entity to perform the prohibited activity;
03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB103
(4) Aids or attempts to aid another person or entity in
performing a prohibited activity; or
(5) Indirectly performs the prohibited activity.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many Arkansans rely on access
to a diverse and competitive pharmacy network for their healthcare needs;
that the inability of some pharmacies or pharmacists to participate in
pharmacy benefits manager networks under relevant and reasonable terms of
participation poses an immediate threat to the availability and affordability
of pharmacy services; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect
public health and ensure equitable access to pharmacy care across the state.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/C. Penzo













03-17-2025 14:25:27 ANS086